Utah statutes.
55-5a-3.   Permit required to sell blind-made products or services or to make sales to help the blind and visually impaired.

(1)  A person, group of persons or organization may not, by any means, sell, transfer or otherwise dispose of goods, articles, or products to the public in this state which are labeled as made by the blind or sold as products of the blind without first securing a permit in writing for each person selling or soliciting the sale of those goods, articles, or products from the Division of Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired.

(2)  A person, group of persons, or organization may not conduct or engage in any business whatsoever in this state, if the word "blind" is used to designate its product's origin or manufacture or if it is used in such a manner as to indicate the services, goods, articles, or products that it provides are blind-made or provide help for the blind or visually impaired, unless a written permit is obtained from the division to do so.

(3)  A person, group of persons, or organization may not conduct any of the activities designated in this section using a name, trade name, logo, or other identifying mark or name which implies that the person, group of persons, or organization using the name is affiliated with or sponsored by the state or any of its agencies or subdivisions, when the person, group of persons, or organization is not sponsored or supported by the state or one of its agencies or subdivisions.



Amended by Chapter 37, 1996 General Session

